District of Columbia statutes.
2-1912.01

Procedures to certify qualified interviewers.

Within 180 days of July 19, 2006, the Chief of Police shall develop and implement a General Order establishing procedures to certify qualified interviewers. The procedures shall include reasonable standards for evaluating the qualifications and credentials of persons who may serve as qualified interviewers. The standards shall take into consideration such factors as native speaking, education, training, experience, and demonstrated competence.

History

Jan. 28, 1988, D.C. Law 7-62, § 13a
as added Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 201(b), 53 DCR 8610

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 201(c) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).